Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2128
Condemnation or disconnection order; service.

A copy of each condemnation or disconnection order shall be served personally or by United States mail upon the property owner at his or her last-known address, the licensee making the installation, and such other persons as the board by rule or regulation may direct.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 28;

Laws 1978, LB 833, § 12;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 81-598;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 25.